Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 6. Public Health Authority and Powers.

Cross references. —

For statement of legislative intent regarding how provisions of
ch. 54, SLA 2005, relating to public health system activities and services, that enacted this article, may be construed, see § 1, ch. 54, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for ch. 54, SLA 2005 (HB 95), relating generally to the duties of various state agencies as those duties pertain to public health and public health emergencies and disasters, see 2005 House Journal 125 — 126.

Collateral references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d, Health, §§ 17 et seq., 58 et seq.

39A C.J.S., Health and Environment, §§ 7 — 13, 18 — 22, 26, 27.

Malpractice in diagnosis or treatment of tuberculosis. 75 ALR2d 814.

Sec. 18.15.350.
SARS control program authorization. [Repealed, § 12 ch 54 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 18.15.355.
Prevention and control of conditions of public health importance.

The department may use the powers and provisions set out in AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

to prevent, control, or ameliorate conditions of public health importance or accomplish other essential public health services and functions.

In performing its duties under AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

, the department may

establish standards

for the prevention, control, or amelioration of conditions of public health importance;

to accomplish other essential public health services and functions; and

adopt regulations to implement and interpret AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For control of diseases of public health importance, see 7 AAC 27, art. 1.

For confidentiality, authorized uses, and security standards, see 7 AAC 27, art. 13.

Sec. 18.15.360.
Data collection.

The department is authorized to collect, analyze, and maintain databases of information related to

risk factors identified for conditions of public health importance;

morbidity and mortality rates for conditions of public health importance;

community indicators relevant to conditions of public health importance;

longitudinal data on traumatic or acquired brain injury from the registry established under AS

47.80.500(c)(1)

;

health care services and price information collected under AS

18.23.400

; and

any other data needed to accomplish or further the mission or goals of public health or provide essential public health services and functions.

The department is authorized to obtain information from federal, state, and local governmental agencies, Alaska Native organizations, health care providers, pre-hospital emergency medical services, or other private and public organizations operating in the state. The department may also use information available from other governmental and private sources, reports of hospital discharge data, information included in death certificates, other vital statistics, environmental data, and public information. The department may request information from and inspect health care records maintained by health care providers that identify individuals or characteristics of individuals with reportable diseases or other conditions of public health importance.

The department may collect information to establish and maintain a comprehensive vaccination registry to aid, coordinate, and promote effective and cost-efficient disease prevention and control efforts in the state.

The department may not acquire identifiable health information under this section without complying with the provisions of AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

and regulations adopted under those statutes.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 2005; am § 1 ch 109 SLA 2010; am § 3 ch 75 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For control of diseases of public health importance, see 7 AAC 27, art. 1.

For confidentiality, authorized uses, and security standards, see 7 AAC 27, art. 13.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective January 1, 2019, added (a)(5), and made related changes.

Sec. 18.15.362.
Acquisition and use of identifiable health information; public health purpose.

The department may acquire and use identifiable health information collected under AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

only if the

acquisition and use of the information relates directly to a public health purpose;

acquisition and use of the information is reasonably likely to contribute to the achievement of a public health purpose; and

public health purpose cannot otherwise be achieved at least as well with nonidentifiable health information.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For control of diseases of public health importance, see 7 AAC 27, art. 1.

For confidentiality, authorized uses, and security standards, see 7 AAC 27, art. 13.

Sec. 18.15.365.
Information security safeguards.

The department shall acquire, use, disclose, and store identifiable health information collected under AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

in a confidential manner that safeguards the security of the information, and maintain the information in a physically and technologically secure environment.

The department shall expunge, in a confidential manner, identifiable health information collected under AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

when the use of the information by the department no longer furthers the public health purpose for which it is required.

A person who knowingly discloses identifiable health information in violation of this section or a regulation adopted under this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. In this subsection, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

A person who intentionally discloses identifiable health information in violation of this section or a regulation adopted under this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. In this subsection, “intentionally” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For confidentiality, authorized uses, and security standards, see 7 AAC 27, art. 13.

Sec. 18.15.370.
Reportable disease list.

The department shall maintain a list of reportable diseases or other conditions of public health importance that must be reported to the department. The list may include birth defects, cancers, injuries, and diseases or other conditions caused by exposure to microorganisms; pathogens; or environmental, toxic, or other hazardous substances. The department shall regularly maintain and may revise the list. The department may also establish registries for diseases and conditions that must be reported to the department.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 2005)

Administrative Code. —

For control of diseases of public health importance, see 7 AAC 27, art. 1.

Sec. 18.15.375.
Epidemiological investigation.

The department may investigate conditions of public health importance in the state through methods of epidemiological investigation. The department may also ascertain the existence of cases of illness or other conditions of public health importance, investigate potential sources of exposure or infection and ensure that they are subject to proper control measures, and determine the extent of the disease outbreak, epidemic, risk to health and safety, or disaster.

Investigations under this section may include identification of individuals who have been or may have been exposed to or affected by a condition of public health importance, interviewing and testing those individuals, examining facilities or materials that may pose a threat to the public health, and interviewing other individuals. In conducting the investigations the department may

identify all individuals thought to have been exposed to any agent that may be a potential cause of the disease outbreak, epidemic, or disaster;

interview, test, examine, or screen an individual where needed to assist in the positive identification of those exposed or affected or to develop information relating to the source or spread of the disease or other condition of public health importance; and

inspect health care records maintained by a health care provider.

When testing, screening, or examining an individual under this section, the department shall adhere to the following requirements:

the department may not require the testing, examination, or screening of an individual without the consent of the individual or the individual’s legal guardian, except as otherwise provided in this section or other law;

the department may require testing, examination, or screening of a nonconsenting individual only upon an order of a state medical officer, and only upon a finding that the individual has or may have been exposed to a contagious disease that poses a significant risk to the public health; the order must be personally served on the person to be tested, examined, or screened within a reasonable period of time before the testing, examination, or screening is to take place;

the department shall obtain an ex parte order in accordance with (d) of this section if the individual to be tested, examined, or screened objects to the state medical officer’s order;

a health care practitioner shall perform an examination under this section; the individual to be examined may, under conditions specified by the state medical officer, choose the health care practitioner who will perform the examination;

a testing, examination, or screening program shall be conducted for the sole purpose of identifying a condition of public health importance that poses a threat to the public health and may be avoided, cured, alleviated, or made less contagious through safe and effective treatment, modifications in individual behavior, or public health intervention;

before testing, examination, or screening, the department shall explain to the individual or individual’s legal representative the nature, scope, purposes, benefits, risks, and possible results of the testing, examination, or screening;

in conjunction with or directly after the dissemination of the results of the testing, examination, or screening, the department shall fully inform the individual or individual’s legal representative of the results of the testing, examination, or screening.

A judicial officer may issue an ex parte order for testing, examination, or screening upon a showing of probable cause, supported by oath or affirmation, that the individual has or may have been exposed to a contagious disease that poses a significant risk to the public health. The court shall specify the duration of the ex parte order for a period not to exceed five days. To conduct the testing, examination, or screening of an individual who is not being detained under an order of isolation or quarantine, the court may order a peace officer to take the individual into protective custody until a hearing is held on the ex parte petition if a hearing is requested.

The individual subject to the ex parte order must be given, with the petition and order, a form to request a hearing to vacate the ex parte order. If a hearing is requested to vacate the ex parte order, the court shall hold the hearing within three working days after the date the request is filed with the court. The public shall be excluded from a hearing under this subsection unless the individual subject to the ex parte order elects to have the hearing open.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For effect of (c)(3), (d), and (e) of this section on Rules 4, 7, 8, 38, 40, 65, and 77, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see sec. 13 (a) — (d), ch. 54, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For control of diseases of public health importance, see 7 AAC 27, art. 1.

For prevention, treatment, and control of diseases of public health importance, see 7 AAC 27, art. 12.

For confidentiality, authorized uses, and security standards, see 7 AAC 27, art. 13.

Sec. 18.15.380.
Medical treatment.

A health care practitioner or public health agent who examines or treats an individual who has or may have been exposed to a contagious disease shall instruct the individual about the measures for preventing transmission of the disease and the need for treatment.

The department may administer medication or other medical treatment, including the use of directly observed therapy where appropriate, to a consenting individual who has or may have been exposed to a contagious disease.

An individual has the right to refuse treatment and may not be required to submit to involuntary treatment as long as the individual is willing to take steps outlined by the state medical officer to prevent the spread of a communicable disease to others. However, an individual who exercises the right to refuse treatment under this subsection may be responsible for paying all costs incurred by the state in seeking and implementing a quarantine or isolation order made necessary by a refusal of treatment by the individual. The department shall notify an individual who refuses treatment under this subsection that the refusal may result in an indefinite period of quarantine or isolation and that the individual may be responsible for payment of the costs of the quarantine or isolation.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 2005)

Sec. 18.15.385.
Isolation and quarantine.

The department may isolate or quarantine an individual or group of individuals if isolation or quarantine is the least restrictive alternative necessary to prevent the spread of a contagious or possibly contagious disease to others in accordance with regulations adopted by the department consistent with the provisions of this section and other law.

The department shall adhere to the following conditions and standards when isolating or quarantining an individual or group of individuals:

isolation and quarantine shall be by the least restrictive means necessary to prevent the spread of a contagious or possibly contagious disease that poses a significant risk to public health; isolation and quarantine may include confinement to private homes or other private and public premises; absent exceptional circumstances that would jeopardize public health, a person shall be allowed to choose confinement in the person’s home;

isolated individuals shall be confined separately from quarantined individuals;

the health status of an isolated or quarantined individual shall be monitored regularly to determine whether the individual continues to require isolation or quarantine;

if a quarantined individual subsequently becomes infected or is reasonably believed to have become infected with a contagious or possibly contagious disease, the individual shall promptly be removed to isolation;

the department shall immediately terminate an isolation and quarantine order when an individual poses no substantial risk of transmitting a contagious or possibly contagious disease to others.

The department may authorize a health care practitioner, public health agent, or another person access to an individual in isolation or quarantine as necessary to meet the needs of the isolated or quarantined individual. An individual who enters isolation or quarantine premises with or without authorization of the department may be isolated or quarantined if needed to protect the public health.

Before quarantining or isolating an individual, the department shall obtain a written order from the superior court authorizing the isolation or quarantine, unless the individual consents to the quarantine or isolation. The department shall file a petition for a written order under this subsection. The petition must

allege

the identity of each individual proposed to be quarantined or isolated;

the premises subject to isolation or quarantine;

the date and time the isolation or quarantine is to begin;

the suspected contagious disease;

that the individual poses a significant risk to public health;

whether testing, screening, examination, treatment, or related procedures are necessary;

that the individual is unable or unwilling to behave so as not to expose other individuals to danger of infection; and

that the department is complying or will comply with (b) of this section; and

be accompanied by an affidavit signed by a state medical officer attesting to the facts asserted in the petition, including specific facts supporting the allegations required by (1)(D) and (G) of this subsection; the petition shall be personally served according to court rules, along with notice of the time and place of the hearing under (f) of this section.

Notwithstanding (d) of this section, when the department has probable cause to believe that the delay involved in seeking a court order imposing isolation or quarantine would pose a clear and immediate threat to the public health and isolation or quarantine is the least restrictive alternative and is necessary to prevent the spread of a contagious or possibly contagious disease, a state medical officer in the department may issue an emergency administrative order to temporarily isolate or quarantine an individual or group of individuals. An emergency administrative order of temporary quarantine or isolation by a state medical officer is enforceable by any peace officer in the state. Within 24 hours after implementation of the emergency administrative order, the department shall notify the superior court by filing a petition under (d) of this section that also alleges that the emergency action was necessary to prevent or limit the transmission of a contagious or possibly contagious disease to others that would pose an immediate threat to the public health. The petition must be signed by a state medical officer.

An individual served with a petition under (d) of this section or an emergency administrative order to temporarily isolate or quarantine under (e) of this section has the right to a court hearing. The court shall hold a hearing within 48 hours after a petition is filed. The department may request a continuance of the hearing for up to five days. The court may grant the continuance for good cause shown and in extraordinary circumstances, giving due regard to the rights of the affected individuals, the protection of the public health, the severity of the need for isolation or quarantine, and other evidence. During a continuance, an isolated or quarantined individual shall remain in isolation or quarantine. The court may order the consolidation of individual claims into group claims if the number of individuals affected is so large as to render individual participation impractical, there are questions of law or fact common to the individual claims or rights to be determined, the group claims or rights are typical of the affected individuals’ claims or rights, and the entire group can be adequately represented. The public shall be excluded from a hearing under this section unless the individual elects to have the hearing open under (g)(2) of this section.

During the hearing, the individual has the right to

view and copy all petitions and reports in the court file of the individual’s case;

elect to have the hearing open to the public;

have the rules of evidence and civil procedure applied so as to provide for the informal but efficient presentation of evidence;

have an interpreter if the individual does not understand English;

present evidence on the individual’s behalf;

cross-examine witnesses who testify against the individual;

call experts and other witnesses to testify on the individual’s behalf; and

participate in the hearing; under this paragraph, participation may be by telephone if the individual presents a substantial risk of transmitting a contagious or possibly contagious disease to others.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the court may commit the individual to isolation or quarantine for not more than 30 days if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that the isolation or quarantine is necessary to prevent or limit the transmission to others of a disease that poses a significant risk to the public health. The court may issue other orders as necessary. Orders are enforceable by a peace officer of this state. The order must

identify the isolated or quarantined individual or group of individuals by name or shared or similar characteristics or circumstances;

specify factual findings warranting isolation or quarantine under this section;

include any conditions necessary to ensure that isolation or quarantine is carried out within the stated purposes and restrictions of this section; and

be served on the affected individual or group of individuals in accordance with existing court rules.

Before the expiration of an order issued under (h) of this section, the court may continue isolation or quarantine for additional periods not to exceed 30 days upon a showing by the department by clear and convincing evidence that the action is necessary to prevent or limit the transmission to others of a disease that poses a significant risk to the public health.

An isolated or quarantined individual or group of individuals may apply to the court for an order to show cause why isolation or quarantine should not be terminated. The court shall rule on the application to show cause within 48 hours after filing. An isolated or quarantined individual or group of individuals may request a hearing in the court for remedies regarding breaches of the conditions of isolation or quarantine. A request for a hearing may not stay or enjoin an isolation or quarantine order. Where extraordinary circumstances justify the immediate granting of relief, the court shall fix a date for hearing on the alleged matters within 24 hours after receipt of the request. Otherwise, the court shall fix a date for hearing on the alleged matters within five days after receipt of a request.

The provisions of this section apply to minors. All notices required to be served on an individual shall also be served on the parents or guardians of an individual who is an unemancipated minor.

The department shall adopt regulations to protect, as much as possible, the privacy rights of individuals subject to isolation or quarantine under this section.

The department may quarantine or isolate individuals who have been exposed to hazardous materials that can cause serious illness or injury by transmission of the hazardous material to others. The provisions of this section concerning isolation and quarantine of individuals to prevent the spread of contagious or possibly contagious diseases shall apply to isolation or quarantine of individuals who have been exposed to hazardous materials.

A person who knowingly violates this section or a regulation adopted under this section is guilty of a class B misdemeanor. In this subsection, “knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

A person who intentionally violates this section or a regulation adopted under this section is guilty of a class A misdemeanor. In this subsection, “intentionally” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900(a)

.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For effect of (d) — (k) of this section on Rules 4, 7, 8, 38, 40, 65, and 77, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see sec. 13 (a) — (d), ch. 54, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

For punishment of class A misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(a)

for imprisonment and AS

12.55.035

for fines.

For punishment of class B misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.135(b)

.

Administrative Code. —

For confidentiality, authorized uses, and security standards, see 7 AAC 27, art. 13.

Sec. 18.15.390.
Powers of the department in a public health disaster.

If the governor declares a condition of disaster emergency under AS

26.23.020(c)

due to an outbreak of disease or a credible threat of an imminent outbreak of disease, the department, in coordination with the Department of Military and Veterans’ Affairs, may

close, direct, and compel the evacuation of, or decontaminate or cause to be decontaminated, any facility if there is reasonable cause to believe that the facility may endanger the public health;

decontaminate or cause to be decontaminated or destroy any material if there is reasonable cause to believe that the material may endanger the public health;

inspect, control, restrict, and regulate, by rationing and using quotas, prohibitions on shipments, allocation, or other means, the use, sale, dispensing, distribution, or transportation of food, fuel, clothing, medicines, and other commodities, as may be reasonable and necessary to respond to the disaster;

adopt and enforce measures to provide for the safe disposal of infectious waste or contaminated material as may be reasonable and necessary to respond to the disaster; these measures may include the collection, storage, handling, destruction, treatment, transportation, or disposal of infectious waste or contaminated material;

require all bags, boxes, or other containers of infectious waste or contaminated material to be clearly identified as containing infectious waste or contaminated material and, if known, the type of infectious waste or contaminated material;

adopt and enforce measures to provide for the safe disposal of human remains as may be reasonable and necessary to respond to the disaster; these measures may include the embalming, burial, cremation, interment, disinterment, transportation, or disposal of human remains;

take possession or control of any human remains, require clear labeling of human remains before disposal with all available information to identify the decedent and the circumstances of death, and require that the human remains of a deceased individual with a contagious disease or transmissible agent have an external, clearly visible tag indicating that the human remains are infected and, if known, the contagious disease or transmissible agent;

require persons in charge of disposing of any human remains to maintain and promptly deliver to the department a written or electronic record of each set of human remains, the disposal of the remains, and all available information to identify the decedent, including fingerprints, photographs, dental information, and a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) specimen of the human remains;

order the disposal of the human remains of an individual who has died of a contagious disease or transmissible agent through burial or cremation within 24 hours after death, taking into account the religious, cultural, family, and individual beliefs of the deceased individual and the individual’s family;

require any business or facility holding a funeral establishment permit issued under AS

08.42.100

to accept human remains, to provide the use of the business or facility as is reasonable and necessary to respond to the disaster, and, if necessary, to transfer the management and supervision of the business or facility to the state during the course of the disaster;

procure, by condemnation or otherwise, a business or facility authorized to embalm, bury, cremate, inter, disinter, transport, and dispose of human remains under the laws of this state as may be reasonable and necessary to respond to the disaster, with the right to take immediate possession of the facilities;

appoint and prescribe the duties of emergency assistant medical examiners as may be required for the proper performance of the duties of the office; the appointment of emergency assistant medical examiners may not exceed the termination of the declaration of a state of disaster; the department may terminate an emergency appointment made under this paragraph for any reason.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For effect of this section on Rule 72, Alaska Rules of Civil Procedure, see sec. 13(e), ch. 54, SLA 2005, in the 2005 Temporary and Special Acts.

For temporary provisions relating to the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared March 11, 2020, see ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

For temporary provisions relating to the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declared January 15, 2021, see ch. 2, SLA 2021, in the 2021 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 18.15.392.
Representation; guardian ad litem.

An individual who is the respondent in proceedings under AS

18.15.375(e)

or

18.15.385

has the right to be represented by counsel in the proceedings. If the individual cannot afford an attorney, the court shall direct the Public Defender Agency to provide an attorney. The court may, on its own motion or upon request of the individual’s attorney or a party, direct the office of public advocacy to provide a guardian ad litem for the individual.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 2005)

Sec. 18.15.393.
Report to legislature.

The department shall annually report to the legislature the activities conducted by the department under AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

, including information pertaining to the number of individuals quarantined, the purpose for the quarantine, and the length of the quarantine.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 2005)

Cross references. —

For additional reporting requirement relating to the COVID-19 public health disaster emergency declaration of March 11, 2020, see § 5, ch. 10, SLA 2020 in the 2020 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For confidentiality, authorized uses, and security standards, see 7 AAC 27, art. 13.

Sec. 18.15.395.
Definitions.

In AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“Alaska Native organization” means an organization recognized by the United States Indian Health Service to provide health-related services;

“condition of public health importance” means a disease, syndrome, symptom, injury, or other threat to health that is identifiable on an individual or community level and can reasonably be expected to lead to adverse health effects in the community;

“contagious disease” means an infectious disease that can be transmitted from individual to individual;

“contaminated material” means wastes or other materials exposed to or tainted by chemical, radiological, or biological substances or agents;

“court” means a court of competent jurisdiction under state law;

“decontaminate” means to remove or neutralize chemical, radiological, or biological substances or residues from individuals, buildings, objects, or areas;

“directly observed therapy” means a technique used to ensure that an infectious individual complies with the individual’s treatment regimen, whereby a health worker observes the individual to ensure the ingestion of the individual’s medication for each dose the individual is required to take over the course of the individual’s treatment;

“disease outbreak” means the sudden and rapid increase in the number of cases of a disease or other condition of public health importance in a population;

“epidemic” means the occurrence in a community or region of a group of similar conditions of public health importance that are in excess of normal expectancy and derived from a common or propagated source;

“essential public health services and functions” mean services and functions to

monitor health status to identify and solve community health problems;

investigate and diagnose health problems and health hazards in the community;

inform and educate individuals about and empower them to deal with health issues;

mobilize public and private sector collaboration and action to identify and solve health problems;

develop policies, plans, and programs that support individual and community health efforts;

enforce statutes and regulations of this state that protect health and ensure safety;

link individuals to needed health services and facilitate the provision of health care when otherwise unavailable;

ensure a competent public health workforce;

evaluate effectiveness, accessibility, and quality of personal and population-based health services; or

research for new insights and innovative solutions to health problems;

“health care practitioner” means a physician, advanced practice registered nurse, or physician assistant licensed or otherwise authorized to practice their respective professions in this state;

“health care provider” means any person that provides health care services; “health care provider” includes a hospital, medical clinic or office, special care facility, medical laboratory, physician, pharmacist, dentist, physician assistant, nurse, paramedic, emergency medical or laboratory technician, community health worker, and ambulance and emergency medical worker;

“identifiable health information” means any information, whether oral, written, electronic, visual, pictorial, physical, or any other form, that relates to an individual’s past, present, or future physical or mental health status, condition, treatment, service, products purchased, or provisions of care and

that reveals the identity of the individual whose health care is the subject of the information; or

regarding which there is a reasonable basis to believe that the information could be used, either alone or with other information that is, or should reasonably be known to be, available to predictable recipients of the information, to reveal the identity of that individual;

“infectious disease” means a disease caused by a living organism or other pathogen, including a fungus, bacteria, parasite, protozoan, or virus; an infectious disease may be transmissible from individual to individual, animal to individual, or insect to individual;

“infectious waste” means

biological waste, including blood and blood products, excretions, exudates, secretions, suctioning and other body fluids, and waste materials saturated with blood or body fluids;

cultures and stocks, including

etiologic agents and associated biologicals;

specimen cultures and dishes and devices used to transfer, inoculate, and mix cultures;

wastes from production of biologicals and serums; and

discarded, killed, or attenuated vaccines;

except for teeth or formaldehyde or other preservative agents, pathological waste, including

biopsy materials and all human tissues;

anatomical parts that emanate from surgery, obstetrical procedures, necropsy or autopsy, and laboratory procedures; and

animal carcasses exposed to pathogens in research and the bedding and other waste from those animals; and

sharps, including needles, intravenous tubing with needles attached, scalpel blades, lancets, breakable glass tubes, and syringes that have been removed from their original sterile containers;

“isolation” means the physical separation and confinement of an individual who is, or group of individuals who are, infected or reasonably believed to be infected with a contagious or possibly contagious disease from nonisolated individuals, to prevent or limit the transmission of the disease to nonisolated individuals;

“least restrictive” means the policy or practice that least infringes on the rights or interests of others;

“public health agent” means an official or employee of the department who is authorized to carry out provisions of AS

18.15.355

—

18.15.395

;

“public health purpose” means the prevention, control, or amelioration of a condition of public health importance, including an analysis or evaluation of a condition of public health importance and an evaluation of a public health program;

“public information” means information that is generally open to inspection or review by the public;

“quarantine” means the physical separation and confinement of an individual or group of individuals who are or may have been exposed to a contagious or possibly contagious disease and who do not show signs or symptoms of a contagious disease from nonquarantined individuals to prevent or limit the transmission of the disease to nonquarantined individuals;

“screening” means the systematic application of a testing or examination to a defined population;

“specimen” means blood; sputum; urine; stool; or other bodily fluids, wastes, tissues, and cultures necessary to perform required tests;

“state medical officer” means a physician licensed to practice medicine by this state and employed by the department, with responsibilities for public health matters;

“testing” means any diagnostic or investigative analysis or medical procedure that determines the presence or absence of or exposure to a condition of public health importance, or its precursor, in an individual;

“transmissible agent” means a biological substance capable of causing disease or infection through individual to individual, animal to individual, or other modes of transmission;

“vaccination” means a suspension of attenuated or noninfectious microorganisms or derivative antigens administered to stimulate antibody production or cellular immunity against a pathogen for the purpose of preventing, ameliorating, or treating an infectious disease.

History.

(§ 8 ch 54 SLA 2005; am § 32 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Administrative Code. —

For disposition of human remains, see 7 AAC 35, art. 1.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (11), substituted “advanced practice registered” for “practitioner” and inserted “licensed or otherwise” preceding “authorized”.